Utah statutes.
79-4-402.   State Park Fees Restricted Account.

(1)  There is created within the General Fund a restricted account known as the State Park Fees Restricted Account.

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the account shall consist of revenue from:

(i)  all charges allowed under Section 79-4-203;

(ii)  proceeds from the sale or disposal of buffalo under Subsection 79-4-1001(2)(b); and

(iii)  civil damages collected under Section 76-6-206.2.

(b)  The account shall not include revenue the division receives under Section 79-4-403 and Subsection 79-4-1001(2)(a).

(3)  The division shall use funds in this account for the purposes described in Section 79-4-203.

